Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,119
Violations; general penalty.

Where no other punishment is provided in the Nebraska Banking Act, any person violating any provision of the act is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 61, p. 95;

R.S.1913, § 341;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 61, p. 710;

C.S.1922, § 8041;

C.S.1929, § 8-1,104;

R.S.1943, § 8-1,107;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 119, p. 184;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 53;

Laws 1987, LB 2, § 19;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 25;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 115.